Maryland, session 2026, HB1572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–701.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1572*

HOUSE BILL 1572
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(s) “Tier 1 renewable source” means one or more of the following types of energy
sources:
(1) solar energy, including energy from photovoltaic technologies and solar
water heating systems;
(2) wind;
(3) qualifying biomass;
(4) methane from the anaerobic decomposition of organic materials in a
landfill or wastewater treatment plant;
(5) geothermal, including energy generated through geothermal exchange
from or thermal energy avoided by, groundwater or a shallow ground source;
(6) ocean, including energy from waves, tides, currents, and thermal
differences;
(7) a fuel cell that produces electricity from a Tier 1 renewable source
under item (3) or (4) of this subsection;
(8) a small hydroelectric power plant of less than 30 megawatts in capacity
that is licensed or exempt from licensing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(9) poultry litter–to–energy;
(10) WASTE–TO–ENERGY;
(11) thermal energy from a thermal biomass system; and
[(11)] (12) raw or treated wastewater used as a heat source or sink for a
heating or cooling system.
(U) “WASTE–TO–ENERGY” MEANS ENERGY GENERATED FROM A FACILITY A
THAT:
(1) DOES NOT USE COMBUSTION;
(2) IS CAPABLE OF GENERATING ENERGY ON A CONTINUOUS BASIS TO
MEET BASE LOAD;
(3) USES A CARBON–RECOVERY SYSTEM;

HOUSE BILL 1572 3
(4) DOES NOT PRODUCE BYPRODUCTS THAT REQUIRE LAND
APPLICATION OR LANDFILL DISPOSAL;
(5) HAS A MINIMUM WASTE–TO–ENERGY CONVERSION RATIO OF 80%;
AND
(6) MEETS THE ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY’S INTERIM
GUIDANCE ON THE DESTRUCTION AND DISPOSAL OF PERFLUOROALKYL AND
POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES AND MATERIALS CONTAINING
PERFLUOROALKYL AND POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES – VERSION 2 (2024).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
renewable energy portfolio standard compliance years starting on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.